Washington statutes.
RCW 27.34.900

Historic Lord mansion.

The building and grounds designated as Block 2, Grainger's Addition to the City of Olympia, County of Thurston, acquired by the state under senate joint resolution No. 18, session of 1939, is hereby designated a part of the state capitol, to be known as the historic Lord mansion.

[ 2017 c 117 s 2; 1993 c 101 s 13; 1981 c 253 s 3; 1941 c 44 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 8265-6. Formerly RCW 27.36.020.]

NOTES:

Findings—1993 c 101: See note following RCW 27.34.010.